Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 2

Operation

16-10-201. Duty of judge to attend court — Adjournment by clerk.

It is the duty of the circuit judge to attend and hold court at the time appointed by law; but if for any reason the circuit judge fails to appear, the clerk of the court may open and adjourn the court from time to time to some future day or days, or, if the clerk thinks the rights and interests of litigants or the business of the court require it, may so open and adjourn the court to some future day or days subsequent to the time allowed by law in which to hold such court. If no judge attends by four o'clock p.m. (4:00 p.m.) on the day to which the clerk last adjourned the court, then the court shall be adjourned by the clerk to the court in course.

Code 1858, § 4220 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 5); Acts 1901, ch. 16, § 1; 1907, ch. 592, § 1; Shan., § 6058; mod. Code 1932, § 10313; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-515; Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 17.

Cross-References. Adjournment by clerk, § 18-4-104.

Terms of court abolished, § 16-2-510.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.17.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

16-10-202. Days court not held.

If, from any cause, the court is not held on any day after it has been opened, there shall be no discontinuance; but, as soon as the cause is removed, the court may proceed to business as before.

Code 1858, § 4222 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 5); Shan., § 6060; Code 1932, § 10315; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-516; Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 18.

Cross-References. Terms of court abolished, § 16-2-510.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.17.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

16-10-203. Duration of court.

Each of the circuit courts shall continue until the business of the court is dispatched, unless the judge is sooner compelled to leave, in order to arrive in time at the next succeeding court of the judicial district.

Code 1858, § 4218 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 4); Shan., § 6056; Code 1932, § 10310; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-517; Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 19.

Cross-References. Terms of court abolished, § 16-2-510.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Dunn v. State, 127 Tenn. 267, 154 S.W. 969, 1912 Tenn. LEXIS 26 (1913).

Collateral References. 14 Am. Jur. 2d Courts § 27.

21 C.J.S. Courts § 151.

Courts
63.

16-10-204. Adjournment during trial.

In no case, after the trial of a cause is commenced, shall the judge adjourn the court until the cause is tried, except in cases where the jury cannot agree, or, from some other cause, a mistrial is ordered.

Code 1858, § 4219 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 4); Shan., § 6057; Code 1932, § 10311; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-518.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Dunn v. State, 127 Tenn. 267, 154 S.W. 969, 1912 Tenn. LEXIS 26 (1913).

16-10-205. Relief from firearm disabilities imposed on persons adjudicated as mental defective or judicially committed to mental institution.

A person who is subject to 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and (g)(4) because the person has been adjudicated as a mental defective or judicially committed to a mental institution, as defined in § 16-10-213, may petition the circuit or criminal court that entered the judicial commitment or adjudication order for relief from the firearm disabilities imposed by the adjudication or judicial commitment; provided, that the person may not petition the court until three (3) years from the date of release from commitment or the date of the adjudication order, whichever is later.

A copy of the petition for relief shall also be served on the district attorney general of the judicial district in which the original judicial commitment or adjudication occurred. The district attorney general may appear, support, object to, or present evidence relevant to the relief sought by the petitioner.

The court shall receive and consider evidence in an open proceeding, including evidence offered by the petitioner, concerning:

The circumstances that led to the imposition of the firearms disability under 18 U.S.C. § 922 (d)(4) and (g)(4);

The petitioner's mental health records;

The petitioner's criminal history;

The petitioner's reputation; and

Changes in the petitioner's condition or circumstances relevant to the relief sought.

The court shall grant the petition for relief if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence and enters into the record the following:

The petitioner is no longer likely to act in a manner that is dangerous to public safety; and

Granting the relief would not be contrary to the public interest.

A record of the proceedings shall be made by a certified court reporter or by court-approved electronic means. Except in matters resulting in criminal adjudication, the means of recording is to be provided by the petitioner.

The petitioner may appeal a final order denying the requested relief, and the review on appeal, if granted, shall be de novo.

A person may file a petition for relief under this section no more than once every two (2) years.

Relief from a firearm disability granted under this section has no effect on the loss of civil rights, including firearm rights, for any reason other than the particular adjudication as a mental defective or judicial commitment to a mental institution from which relief is granted.

When the court issues an order granting a petition of relief under subsection (d), the court clerk shall, as soon as practicable but no later than thirty (30) days after issuance, forward a copy of the order to the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI). The TBI, upon receipt of the order, shall:

Immediately forward a copy of the order to the department of safety;

Update the National Instant Criminal Background Check System database and transmit the corrected records to the federal bureau of investigation; and

Remove and destroy all records relating to the petition for relief from any database over which the TBI exercises control.

The TBI and the department of safety shall not use or permit the use of the records or information obtained or retained pursuant to this section for any purpose not specified in this section.

Acts 2015, ch. 459, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-10-205 (Acts 1899, ch. 40, § 1; Shan., § 6057a1; Code 1932, § 10312; Acts 1947, ch. 48, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-519), concerning extension of term, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 20. For section abolishing terms of court, see § 16-2-510.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 459, § 6. July 1, 2015.

16-10-206. Pleadings in absence of judge.

The nonattendance of a circuit court judge shall not prevent the parties from making up their pleadings in the appearance causes.

Code 1858, § 4224 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 49, § 3); Shan., § 6062; Code 1932, § 10317; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-520.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

16-10-207. Continuance in absence of judge.

None of the proceedings pending in the circuit or criminal courts shall be discontinued by the nonattendance of the judge, or the judge's death at any time, but, in such cases, all matters depending shall stand continued, if no designated judge appear to serve.

Code 1858, § 4223 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 8); Shan., § 6061; mod. Code 1932, § 10316; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-521; Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 21.

Cross-References. Terms of court abolished, § 16-2-510.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.17.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

16-10-208 — 16-10-211. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 16-10-208 — 16-10-211 (Code 1858, § 4221 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 5); 1905, ch. 113, § 2; Shan., §§ 5745a2, 6059; Code 1932, §§ 9938, 10314; Acts 1943, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 9945.5, 9945.6 (Williams, § 9945.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 16-522 — 16-525), concerning adjourned terms and process returnable to succeeding term, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 22. For provisions abolishing terms of court, see § 16-2-510.

16-10-212. Money paid into court — Power of disposition.

When money is paid into the circuit or law courts of this state to satisfy judgments rendered in the circuit or law court, or money is paid into the circuit or law courts by reason of other proceedings had in the courts, and the money belongs to or is the property of minors, life tenants, beneficiaries of the remainder interests or contingent beneficiaries of the remainder interests or persons adjudicated incompetent, the courts are vested with powers to dispose of or to enter such orders in regard to the money as courts of chancery now have. Nothing in this section shall be construed as to deprive the chancery courts of their jurisdiction in regard to such matters.

Acts 1955, ch. 140, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-526; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “persons adjudicated incompetent” for “persons of unsound mind” in the middle of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 110. July 1, 2011.

16-10-213. Information to be collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS index and the department of safety by those circuit courts and criminal courts in which commitments to a mental institution are ordered.

As used in this section:

“Adjudication as a mental defective or adjudicated as a mental defective” means:

A determination by a court in this state that a person, as a result of marked subnormal intelligence, mental illness, incompetency, condition or disease:

Is a danger to such person or to others; or

Lacks the ability to contract or manage such person's own affairs due to mental defect;

A finding of insanity by a court in a criminal proceeding; or

A finding that a person is incompetent to stand trial or is found not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to §§ 50a and 72b of the Uniform Code of Military Justice, codified in 10 U.S.C. §§ 850a, 876b;

“Judicial commitment to a mental institution” means a judicially ordered involuntary admission to a private or state hospital or treatment resource in proceedings conducted pursuant to title 33, chapter 6 or 7;

“Mental institution” means a mental health facility, mental hospital, sanitarium, psychiatric facility and any other facility that provides diagnoses by a licensed professional of mental retardation or mental illness, including, but not limited to, a psychiatric ward in a general hospital; and

“Treatment resource” means any public or private facility, service or program providing treatment or rehabilitation services for mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, including, but not limited to, detoxification centers, hospitals, community mental health centers, clinics or programs, halfway houses and rehabilitation centers.

Those circuit courts and criminal courts wherein commitments to a mental institution are ordered pursuant to title 33, chapter 6 or 7 or persons are adjudicated as a mental defective shall enter a standing and continuing order instructing the clerk to collect and report as soon as practicable, but no later than the third business day following the date of such an order or adjudication, information described in subsection (c) regarding individuals who have been adjudicated as a mental defective or judicially committed to a mental institution for the purposes of complying with the NICS Improvement Amendments Act of 2007, P.L. 110-180.

The following information shall be collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS Index and the department of safety, pursuant to subsection (b):

Complete name and all aliases of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective, including, but not limited to, any names that the individual may have had or currently has by reason of marriage or otherwise;

Case or docket number of the judicial commitment or the adjudication as a mental defective;

Date judicial commitment ordered or adjudication as a mental defective was made;

Private or state hospital or treatment resource to which the individual was judicially committed;

Date of birth of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective, if such information has been provided to the clerk;

Race and sex of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective; and

Social security number of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective if available.

The information in subdivisions (c)(1)-(5), the confidentiality of which is protected by other statutes or regulations, shall be maintained as confidential and not subject to public inspection pursuant to applicable statutes or regulations, except for such use as may be necessary in the conduct of any proceedings pursuant to §§ 38-6-109, 39-17-1316, and 39-17-1352 — 39-17-1354.

Acts 2009, ch. 578, § 1; 2013, ch. 300, § 3; 2018, ch. 799, §§ 2, 5.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “collect and report as soon as practicable, but no later than the third business day following the date of such an order or adjudication” for “collect and report January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of every year beginning January 1, 2010” in (b).

The 2018 amendment added (c)(6) and (7); and substituted “applicable statutes” for “such statutes” and substituted “pursuant to §§ 38-6-109, 39-17-1316, and 39-17-1352 — 39-17-1354” for “pursuant to §§ 39-17-1316, 39-17-1353 and 39-17-1354” at the end of (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 578, § 13. January 1, 2010.

Acts 2013, ch. 300, § 11. July 1, 2013.

Acts 2018, ch. 799, § 7. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 16-10-213 does not conflict with the patient privacy protections of either T.C.A. title 33 or the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (“HIPAA”) privacy provisions. OAG 10-56, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (4/26/10).